Hawaii statutes.
§653-17 Warrants charged against
beneficiary. All warrants drawn and delivered on account of any judgment,
as hereinbefore provided, shall be noted and charged against the beneficiary in
like manner as if they had been drawn and delivered to the beneficiary
personally on account of such salary, stipend, wages, or annuity. [L 1890, c
50, §16; am L 1903, c 53, §6; am L 1921, c 66, §1; RL 1925, §2861; RL 1935,
§4306; RL 1945, §10337; RL 1955, §238-17; HRS §653-17; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next